Utah statutes.
70A-2-805.   Refunds -- Computation -- Prohibition of enforcement of lease
against consumer.
(1)  Refunds paid by the manufacturer shall be made to the consumer, any
lessor, and any perfected lienholders as their interests may appear in order
of priority.
(2)  A reasonable allowance for use may not exceed the amount obtained by
multiplying the full purchase price or lease price of the assistive technology
by a fraction, the denominator of which is 1,825 and the numerator of which is
the number of days the consumer used the assistive technology before first
reporting the nonconformity to the manufacturer, its agent, or authorized
dealer or lessor.
(3) (a)  For a consumer who leases assistive technology from a lessor, the
manufacturer shall refund to the lessor and to any holder of a perfected
security interest in the assistive technology, as the interest may appear, the
current value of the written lease.
(b)  The current value of the written lease equals the total amount for which
that lease obligates the consumer during the period of the lease remaining
after its early termination, plus the assistive technology dealer's early
termination costs and the value of the assistive technology at the lease
expiration date if the lease sets forth that value, less the assistive
technology lessor's early termination savings.
(c)  The manufacturer shall refund to the consumer the amount that the
consumer paid under the lease plus any collateral costs, less a reasonable
allowance for use.
(4)  The lease may not be enforced against the consumer if the consumer
receives a refund under this chapter.
